North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 122C-1.
Short title.

This Chapter may be cited as the Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.

History.

1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, ss. 1, 2.

Cross References.

See the editor’s notes under

G.S. 122C-22

referring to Session Laws 1999-237, ss. 18.8(a) through 18.8(c) regarding facility exemptions from licensure and certificate of need.

For exception from licensure under this chapter of inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facilities that provide service exclusively to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety, see

G.S. 148-19.1

.

As to establishment of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative, see

G.S. 143B-366

.

Mental Health/Substance Use Disorder Central Assessment and Navigation System Pilot Program.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11F.7(a)-(c), provides: “(a) Pilot Program Creation. — Of the funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2017-2018 fiscal year and the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2018-2019 fiscal year shall be used to oversee, in consultation with the local management entity/managed care organization (LME/MCO) responsible for the management and provision of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services in New Hanover County under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, the establishment of a two-year pilot program to focus on assessing and navigating individuals seeking mental health or substance use disorder services, or both, to appropriate community-based services or other community resources in order to reduce the utilization of hospital emergency department services for mental health and substance use disorder services.

“(b) Program Design and Location. — The pilot program shall be conducted at New Hanover Regional Medical Center (NHRMC) and at Wellness City, operated by Recovery Innovations, Inc., by a three-person centralized team. The three-person team shall consist of the following individuals:

“(1) A master’s level, fully licensed clinician to perform comprehensive clinical assessments of NHRMC patients and other New Hanover County residents exhibiting symptoms of mental illness or substance use disorder who are referred to the pilot program.

“(2) A qualified professional to assist patients, particularly those with a completed comprehensive clinical assessment, with identifying and accessing appropriate community-based services or other community resources.

“(3) A North Carolina certified peer support specialist, with specialized training and personal experience in successfully managing his or her own serious mental illness or substance use disorder, to provide peer support services, including encouraging patients to take personal responsibility for managing their condition, assisting patients in establishing meaningful roles in society, and providing patients with transportation to and from appointments.

“(c) Reports. — By July 1, 2018, the LME/MCO responsible for the management and provision of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in New Hanover County, in collaboration with New Hanover Regional Medical Center and Recovery Innovations, Inc., shall submit an interim report on the effectiveness of the pilot program to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (Division). By October 1, 2018, the Division shall submit an interim report on the effectiveness of the program and the costs associated with administering the program to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division.

“By July 1, 2019, the LME/MCO responsible for the management and provision of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in New Hanover County, in collaboration with New Hanover Regional Medical Center and Recovery Innovations, Inc., shall submit a final report of the program to the Division. By October 1, 2019, the Division shall then submit a final report of the program to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall include the Division’s recommendations with respect to sustaining or expanding the program.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.’ ”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.4, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12F.4A(a)-(e), as amended by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11F.16, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall require local management entities, including local management entities that have been approved to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver (LME/MCOs), to implement clinical integration activities with Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) through Total Care, a collaborative initiative designed to improve and minimize the cost of care for patients who suffer from comorbid mental health or substance abuse and primary care or other chronic conditions.

“(b) The Department shall ensure that, by no later than January 1, 2014, all LME/MCOs submit claims data, including to the extent practical, retrospective claims data and integrated payment and reporting system (IPRS) data, to the CCNC Informatics Center and to the Medicaid Management Information System. Upon receipt of this claims data, CCNC shall provide access to clinical data and care management information within the CCNC Informatics Center to LME/MCOs and authorized behavioral health providers to support (i) treatment, quality assessment, and improvement activities or (ii) coordination of appropriate and effective patient care, treatment, or habilitation.

“(c) The Department, in consultation with CCNC and the LME/MCOs, shall develop quality and performance statistics on the status of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, including, but not limited to, variations in total cost of care, clinical outcomes, and access to and utilization of services.

“(d) The Department shall, within available appropriations and as deemed necessary by the Department, expand or alter existing contracts by mutual agreement of all parties to the contract in order to implement the provisions of this section.

“(e) Repealed by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11F.16, effective July 1, 2017.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12F.5, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall not take any further action or expend any funds appropriated or available to the Department to develop and implement the health care information system for State facilities operated by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services until each of the following conditions has been met:

“(1) By no later than March 1, 2014, the Department shall submit a detailed plan of this system to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology, and the Fiscal Research Division. The plan shall include an explanation of at least all of the following:

“a. The process the Department used to select the Veterans Health Information Systems and Technology Architecture (VisTA), whether or not the selection process was competitive, and if not, why it was not.

“b. Requirements for vendor services to support system implementation and operation and the costs associated with this support.

“c. Governance structure for the system.

“d. Modules to be implemented in each facility and the reason for each.

“e. Assignment of responsibility for system maintenance, codes fixes, application upgrades, and hardware upgrades.

“f. Whether the application and database will be implemented at each facility or centrally managed by the Department and the reasons for the decision.

“g. Identification of additional hardware that will be required to support a statewide rollout and the location at which the Department plans to host it.

“h. Assignment of responsibility for backup and recovery.

“i. If there will be redundant failover between facilities.

“j. Plans, time lines, and costs for implementing any other modules currently offered by the United State Department of Veterans Affairs.

“k. A process for ensuring that the system software is upgraded whenever the United States Department of Veterans Affairs upgrades its system.

“
l
. Technology constraints for VisTA and State-supported facilities and how they will be addressed, by facility.

“m. Facility on-boarding plan for the State psychiatric hospitals and other State facilities operated by the Division.

“n. Costs and sources of funding for planning, development, and implementation at each facility and five years of costs and sources of funding for operations and maintenance at each facility.

“o. Any other costs associated with system planning, development, implementation, operation, and maintenance.

“p. Any issues associated with the planning, development, and implementation, identified by the Department, the Office of the State Chief Information Officer, the Office of Information Technology Services, or the Office of State Budget and Management, with a solution for each identified issue.

“(2) Upon submission of the plan required by subdivision (1) of this section, the Department shall obtain prior approval from the State Chief Information Officer in order to take any further action or expend any funds appropriated or available to the Department to develop and implement the health care information system for State facilities operated by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.”

Session Laws 2010-152, ss. 18.1-18.6, provide: “SECTION 18.1. The Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct a study and propose recommendations by January 31, 2011, regarding the cost-effectiveness of supportive housing as an alternative to institutionalization of the MH/DD/SA populations.

“SECTION 18.2. The study shall be conducted by a task force appointed by the Secretary of Health and Human Services.

“SECTION 18.3. The Task Force shall include the following:

“(1) Five representatives from various areas of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(2) One representative from the Housing Trust Fund.

“(3) Six representatives from Local Management Entities.

“(4) Two representatives from the North Carolina Department of Correction [now the Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety].

“(5) One representative from the Division of Medical Assistance.

“(6) One representative from Community Care of North Carolina.

“(7) Two representatives from private providers of housing services for the mentally ill.

“(8) Two representatives from public housing agencies.

“(9) Two consumer representatives — a direct consumer and a family member, from a MH/DD/SA consumer/advocacy group.

“SECTION 18.4. The Secretary of Health and Human Services shall appoint two cochairs of the Task Force.

“SECTION 18.5. The Task Force will propose a plan focusing on the following goals:

“(1) Develop a cost-effective system of care for the MH/DD/SA population.

“(2) Decrease the need for hospital admission of target population.

“(3) Decrease the length of stay in psychiatric hospitals.

“(4) Decrease incarceration rate of the MH/DD/SA populations.

“(5) Decrease emergency room use by the MH/DD/SA populations.

“(6) Improve level of functioning of the MH/DD/SA populations.

“(7) Explore funding possibilities from Medicaid and other sources.

“(8) Decrease homelessness among the MH/DD/SA populations.

“(9) Maintain MH/DD/SA patients in community setting.

“(10) Decrease impact on law enforcement.

“(11) Make our communities safer for both consumers and others.

“(12) Reduce recidivism for the MH/DD/SA population.

“SECTION 18.6. The Task Force shall:

“(1) Identify frequent users of psychiatric beds (State and community) and emergency departments.

“(2) For the above group, determine:

“a. Their housing situation.

“b. Incarceration history.

“c. Recidivism rates.

“d. Treatment offered and treatment compliance.

“e. Other factors as determined by Task Force.

“(3) Review existing State and national initiatives in this area.

“(4) Use information from subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section to do the following:

“a. Study current practices and issues related to placement of MH/DD/SA populations following discharge from psychiatric facilities.

“b. Develop a business case for the development of a statewide supportive housing initiative to benefit MH/DD/SA populations.

“c. Calculate the number of supportive housing units needed in the State.

“d. Calculate the level of capital investment needed for this multiyear initiative.

“e. Propose different methods that could be used to pay for ongoing operational costs.

“f. Examine the potential cost-saving attained through this strategy.

“g. Calculate the level of capital investment needed for this multiyear initiative.

“(5) Other tasks as identified by the Task Force.”

Session Laws 2011-185, s. 2(a), provides: “The Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services of the Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate with military agencies and other appropriate organizations to determine gaps in the care of current and former members of the reserve or active components of the Armed Forces of the United States with traumatic brain injury, shall develop recommendations for an accessible community-based neurobehavioral system of care for those service members, and shall report its recommendations by July 1, 2012, to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Health and Human Services and Justice and Public Safety, to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Homeland Security, Military, and Veterans Affairs, and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. The recommendations shall be tailored so that, if implemented, services would be available to service members, veterans, and their families and would consist of neurobehavioral programs, residential programs, comprehensive day programs, and home-based programs.”

Session Laws 2011-185, s. 2(b), provides: “The Division of Medical Assistance of the Department of Health and Human Services, MedSolutions, Inc., and the appropriate health professionals at the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall work together to ensure that MedSolutions, Inc., is using the appropriate evidence-based diagnostic testing (including imaging, biomarker testing, and other tests) for screening and assessment of traumatic brain injury.”

Session Laws 2011-185, s. 3(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The North Carolina Area Health Education Centers (AHEC) Program shall facilitate and continue to provide health education and skills training for health professional students; primary care, mental health, and substance abuse service providers; and hospital administrators about the health, mental health, and substance abuse needs of the military and their families. This training shall include information about the following:

“(1) The number of North Carolinians who are serving or who have served in the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States.

“(2) Military culture.

“(3) The average number of deployments, length of time in conflict zones, and potential injuries these members may have faced, particularly those who have served recently in Iraq or Afghanistan.

“(4) The types of health, mental health, and substance abuse disorders that service personnel may have experienced, including traumatic brain injury (TBI), posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD), military sexual trauma (MST), depression, substance use disorders, potential suicide risks, or domestic violence.

“(5) The potential impact of the deployment cycle on family members and children. This information shall include information about resiliency skills, intervention skills, resources, and community supports.

“(6) Evidence-based screening and assessment instruments.

“(7) Evidence-based case management, treatment, and medication management for different mental health and substance abuse problems, and potential adverse effects of prescribed medications, particularly for people with comorbidities.

“(8) Information about the TRICARE system, payment, and enrollment procedures.

“(9) Available referral sources through TRICARE, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, Military One Source, Army One Source, Defense Centers of Excellence, Deployment Health Clinical Center, the North Carolina National Guard’s Integrated Behavioral Health System, Local Management Entities, the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) Office of Citizen Services, North Carolina Health Info, Federally Qualified Health Centers, professional advocacy and support services, and other community resources.

“(b) In carrying out the requirements of Section 3(a) of this act, the AHEC Program shall collaborate with the Citizen Soldier Support Program; North Carolina health professional training programs; the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; the North Carolina Division of Veterans Affairs; The University of North Carolina; Operation Re-Entry North Carolina; the North Carolina Community College System; health care professional associations; the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services; Governor’s Focus on Servicemembers, Veterans, and Their Families; and academic health programs.”

§ 122C-2.
Policy.

The policy of the State is to assist individuals with needs for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in ways consistent with the dignity, rights, and responsibilities of all North Carolina citizens. Within available resources it is the obligation of State and local government to provide mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services through a delivery system designed to meet the needs of clients in the least restrictive, therapeutically most appropriate setting available and to maximize their quality of life. It is further the obligation of State and local government to provide community-based services when such services are appropriate, unopposed by the affected individuals, and can be reasonably accommodated within available resources and taking into account the needs of other persons for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

State and local governments shall develop and maintain a unified system of services centered in area authorities or county programs. The public service system will strive to provide a continuum of services for clients while considering the availability of services in the private sector. Within available resources, State and local government shall ensure that the following core services are available:

Screening, assessment, and referral.

Emergency services.

Service coordination.

Consultation, prevention, and education.

Within available resources, the State shall provide funding to support services to targeted populations, except that the State and counties shall provide matching funds for entitlement program services as required by law.

As used in this Chapter, the phrase “within available resources” means State funds appropriated and non-State funds and other resources appropriated, allocated or otherwise made available for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

The furnishing of services to implement the policy of this section requires the cooperation and financial assistance of counties, the State, and the federal government.

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; 1979, c. 358, s. 1; 1983, c. 383, s. 1; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; c. 771; 1989, c. 625, s. 2; 2001-437, s. 1.1.